Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB642.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 139.472 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the taxes imposed by this
chapter shall not apply to the sale or purchase of:
(a) A drug purchased for the treatment of a human being for which a prescription
is required by state or federal law, whether the drug is dispensed by a licensed
pharmacist, administered by a physician or other health care provider, or
distributed as a free sample to or from a physician's office;
(b) An over-the-counter drug purchased for the treatment of a human being for
which a prescription is issued;
(c) Medical oxygen and oxygen delivery equipment purchased for home use.
Oxygen delivery equipment includes:
1. High pressure cylinders, cryogenic tanks, oxygen concentrators, or
similar medical oxygen delivery equipment including repair and
replacement parts for the equipment; and
2. Tubes, masks, and similar items required for the delivery of oxygen to
the patient;
(d) Insulin and diabetic supplies, including hypodermic syringes, needles, and
sugar (urine and blood) testing materials purchased by an individual for
private use;
(e) Colostomy, urostomy, or ileostomy supplies purchased by an individual for
private use;
(f) Prosthetic devices purchased by any health care provider for use in the
treatment of a specific individual or purchased by an individual as prescribed
by a person authorized under the laws of the Commonwealth to issue
prescriptions;
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 2/16/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1806
(g) Prosthetic devices that are individually designed or created for an individual
regardless of the purchaser;
(h) Mobility enhancing equipment for which a prescription is issued;[ and]
(i) Durable medical equipment, including hospital beds for which a prescription
is issued; and
(j) 1. Breast pumps, breast pump kits, and breast pump storage and
collection supplies sold or purchased on or after July 1, 2025, and on
or before June 30, 2029.
2. On or before September 1, 2026, and on or before each September 1
thereafter as long as the exemption applies, the department shall
report to the Legislative Research Commission, for referral to the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, the total
amount of tax exemption that has been claimed for the immediately
preceding fiscal year and the total cumulative amount of the
exemption claimed.
(2) Except as specifically provided in subsection (1) of this section, supplies or
equipment used to deliver a drug to a patient are taxable.
(3) As used in this section and KRS 139.480:
(a) "Breast pump" means:
1. An electrically or manually controlled pump device designed or
marketed to be used to express milk from a human breast during
lactation; and
2. Any battery, AC adapter, or other power supply unit packaged and
sold with the pump device at the time of sale to power the pump
device;
(b) 1. "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means tangible
personal property designed or marketed to be used in conjunction with
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 2/16/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1806
a breast pump to collect milk expressed from a human breast or store
collected breast milk until it is ready for consumption.
2. "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" includes but is not
limited to:
a. Breast shields and breast shield connectors;
b. Breast pump tubes and tubing adapters;
c. Breast pump valves and membranes;
d. Backflow protectors and backflow protector adapters;
e. Bottles and bottle caps specific to the operation of a breast pump;
f. Breast milk storage bags; and
g. Other items that may be useful to initiate, support, or sustain
breastfeeding using a breast pump during lactation, which may
be sold separately, but are generally sold as part of a breast
pump kit.
3. Unless sold as a part of a breast pump kit prepackaged by the breast
pump manufacturer or distributor, "breast pump collection and
storage supplies" does not include:
a. Bottles and bottle caps not specific to the operation of a breast
pump;
b. Breast pump travel bags and other similar carrying accessories;
c. Ice packs, labels, and other similar products;
d. Breast pump cleaning supplies;
e. Nursing bras, bra pads, breast shells, and other similar products;
and
f. Creams, ointments, and other similar products that relieve
breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the breast or
nipples;
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 2/16/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1806
(c) "Breast pump kit" means a kit that contains a breast pump and one (1) or
more of the following:
1. Breast pump collection and storage supplies; and
2. Other items of tangible personal property that may be useful to
initiate, support, or sustain breastfeeding using a breast pump during
lactation if these items, when sold with the breast pump kit, are less
than ten percent (10%) of the total sales price of the breast pump kit;
(d) "Drug" means a compound, substance, or preparation and any component of a
compound, substance, or preparation, other than food and food ingredients,
dietary supplements, or alcoholic beverages as defined in KRS 139.485, that
is recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official
Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National
Formulary, or a supplement to any of them, or is:
1. Intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or
prevention of disease; or
2. Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body;
(e)[(b)] "Grooming and hygiene products" means soaps and cleaning solutions,
shampoo, toothpaste, mouthwash, antiperspirants, and suntan lotions,
regardless of whether the items meet the definition of an over-the-counter
drug;
(f)[(c)] 1. "Over-the-counter drug" means a drug that contains a label that
identifies the product as a drug as required by 21 C.F.R. sec. 201.66.
The "over-the-counter drug" label shall include:
a. A "Drug Facts" panel; or
b. A statement of the active ingredients with a list of those
ingredients contained in the compound, substance, or preparation.
2. "Over-the-counter drug" shall not include grooming and hygiene
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 2/16/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1806
products;
(g)[(d)] "Prescription" means an order, formula, or recipe issued in any form of
oral, written, electronic, or other means of transmission by a person
authorized under the laws of the Commonwealth to prescribe a drug;
(h)[(e)] 1. "Prosthetic device" means a replacement, corrective, or supportive
device, including repair and replacement parts for the device, worn on or
in the body to:
a. Artificially replace a missing portion of the body;
b. Prevent or correct a physical deformity or malfunction; or
c. Support a weak or deformed portion of the body.
2. "Prosthetic device" shall not include any of the following:
a. Corrective eyeglasses;
b. Contact lenses; or
c. Dental prosthesis;
(i)[(f)] 1. "Mobility enhancing equipment" means equipment, including
repair and replacements part for same, which:
a. Is primarily and customarily used to provide or increase the ability
to move from one place to another and which is appropriate for
use either in a home or a motor vehicle;
b. Is not generally used by persons with normal mobility; and
c. Does not include any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor
vehicle normally provided by a motor vehicle manufacturer.
2. "Mobility enhancing equipment" shall not include durable medical
equipment; and
(j)[(g)] 1. "Durable medical equipment" means equipment, including repair
and replacement parts for same, which:
a. Can withstand repeated use;
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 2/16/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1806
b. Is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;
c. Generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness or
injury; and
d. Is not worn in or on the body.
2. "Durable medical equipment" shall not include mobility enhancing
equipment or oxygen delivery equipment that is not worn in or on the
body.
3. As used in this paragraph, "repair and replacement parts" includes all
components or attachments used in connection with durable medical
equipment.
Section 2. KRS 131.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No present or former commissioner or employee of the department, present or
former member of a county board of assessment appeals, present or former property
valuation administrator or employee, present or former secretary or employee of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet, former secretary or employee of the Revenue
Cabinet, or any other person, shall intentionally and without authorization inspect
or divulge any information acquired by him or her of the affairs of any person, or
information regarding the tax schedules, returns, or reports required to be filed with
the department or other proper officer, or any information produced by a hearing or
investigation, insofar as the information may have to do with the affairs of the
person's business.
(2) The prohibition established by subsection (1) of this section shall not extend to:
(a) Information required in prosecutions for making false reports or returns of
property for taxation, or any other infraction of the tax laws;
(b) Any matter properly entered upon any assessment record, or in any way made
a matter of public record;
(c) Furnishing any taxpayer or his or her properly authorized agent with
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 2/16/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1806
information respecting his or her own return;
(d) Testimony provided by the commissioner or any employee of the department
in any court, or the introduction as evidence of returns or reports filed with the
department, in an action for violation of state or federal tax laws or in any
action challenging state or federal tax laws;
(e) Providing an owner of unmined coal, oil or gas reserves, and other mineral or
energy resources assessed under KRS 132.820, or owners of surface land
under which the unmined minerals lie, factual information about the owner's
property derived from third-party returns filed for that owner's property, under
the provisions of KRS 132.820, that is used to determine the owner's
assessment. This information shall be provided to the owner on a confidential
basis, and the owner shall be subject to the penalties provided in KRS
131.990(2). The third-party filer shall be given prior notice of any disclosure
of information to the owner that was provided by the third-party filer;
(f) Providing to a third-party purchaser pursuant to an order entered in a
foreclosure action filed in a court of competent jurisdiction, factual
information related to the owner or lessee of coal, oil, gas reserves, or any
other mineral resources assessed under KRS 132.820. The department may
promulgate an administrative regulation establishing a fee schedule for the
provision of the information described in this paragraph. Any fee imposed
shall not exceed the greater of the actual cost of providing the information or
ten dollars ($10);
(g) Providing information to a licensing agency, the Transportation Cabinet, or
the Kentucky Supreme Court under KRS 131.1817;
(h) Statistics of gasoline and special fuels gallonage reported to the department
under KRS 138.210 to 138.448;
(i) Providing any utility gross receipts license tax return information that is
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 2/16/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1806
necessary to administer the provisions of KRS 160.613 to 160.617 to
applicable school districts on a confidential basis;
(j) Providing documents, data, or other information to a third party pursuant to an
order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(k) Publishing administrative writings on its official website in accordance with
KRS 131.020(1)(b); or
(l) Providing information to the Legislative Research Commission under:
1. KRS 139.519 for purposes of the sales and use tax refund on building
materials used for disaster recovery;
2. KRS 141.436 for purposes of the energy efficiency products credits;
3. KRS 141.437 for purposes of the ENERGY STAR home and the
ENERGY STAR manufactured home credits;
4. KRS 141.383 for purposes of the film industry incentives;
5. KRS 154.26-095 for purposes of the Kentucky industrial revitalization
tax credit[credits] and the job assessment fees;
6. KRS 141.068 for purposes of the Kentucky investment fund;
7. KRS 141.396 for purposes of the angel investor [tax ]credit;
8. KRS 141.389 for purposes of the distilled spirits credit;
9. KRS 141.408 for purposes of the inventory credit;
10. KRS 141.390 for purposes of the recycling and composting credit;
11. KRS 141.3841 for purposes of the selling farmer [tax ]credit;
12. KRS 141.4231 for purposes of the renewable chemical production [tax
]credit;
13. KRS 141.524 for purposes of the Education Opportunity Account
Program [tax ]credit;
14. KRS 141.398 for purposes of the development area tax credit;
15. KRS 139.516 for the purposes of the sales and use tax
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 2/16/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1806
exemptions[exemption] on the commercial mining of cryptocurrency;
16. KRS 141.419 for purposes of the decontamination[ tax] credit;
17. KRS 141.391 for purposes of the qualified broadband investment[ tax]
credit;[ and]
18. KRS 139.499 for purposes of the sales and use tax
exemptions[exemption] for a qualified data center project; and
19. Section 1 of this Act for purposes of the exemption for sale or
purchase of breast pumps and related supplies.
(3) The commissioner shall make available any information for official use only and on
a confidential basis to the proper officer, agency, board or commission of this state,
any Kentucky county, any Kentucky city, any other state, or the federal
government, under reciprocal agreements whereby the department shall receive
similar or useful information in return.
(4) Access to and inspection of information received from the Internal Revenue Service
is for department use only, and is restricted to tax administration purposes.
Information received from the Internal Revenue Service shall not be made available
to any other agency of state government, or any county, city, or other state, and
shall not be inspected intentionally and without authorization by any present
secretary or employee of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, commissioner or
employee of the department, or any other person.
(5) Statistics of crude oil as reported to the department under the crude oil excise tax
requirements of KRS Chapter 137 and statistics of natural gas production as
reported to the department under the natural resources severance tax requirements
of KRS Chapter 143A may be made public by the department by release to the
Energy and Environment Cabinet, Department for Natural Resources.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning with mine-map
submissions for the 1989 tax year, the department may make public or divulge only
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 2/16/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1806
those portions of mine maps submitted by taxpayers to the department pursuant to
KRS Chapter 132 for ad valorem tax purposes that depict the boundaries of mined-
out parcel areas. These electronic maps shall not be relied upon to determine actual
boundaries of mined-out parcel areas. Property boundaries contained in mine maps
required under KRS Chapters 350 and 352 shall not be construed to constitute land
surveying or boundary surveys as defined by KRS 322.010 and any administrative
regulations promulgated thereto.
Section 3. The Act takes effect July 1, 2025.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 2/16/2025 1:20 PM Jacketed